Nebraska, session 109, LB1113.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1113 LB1113
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 18-2147, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
18-2147 (1) Any redevelopment plan as originally approved or as
later modified pursuant to section 18-2117 may contain a provision that
any ad valorem tax levied upon real property, or any portion thereof, in
a redevelopment project for the benefit of any public body shall be
divided, for the applicable period described in subsection (4) of this
section, as follows:
(a) That portion of the ad valorem tax which is produced by the levy
at the rate fixed each year by or for each such public body upon the
redevelopment project valuation shall be paid into the funds of each such
public body in the same proportion as are all other taxes collected by or
for the body. When there is not a redevelopment project valuation on a
parcel or parcels, the county assessor shall determine the redevelopment
project valuation based upon the fair market valuation of the parcel or
parcels as of January 1 of the year prior to the year that the ad valorem
taxes are to be divided. The county assessor shall provide written notice
of the redevelopment project valuation to the authority as defined in
section 18-2103 and the owner. The authority or owner may protest the
valuation to the county board of equalization within thirty days after
the date of the valuation notice. All provisions of section 77-1502
except dates for filing of a protest, the period for hearing protests,
and the date for mailing notice of the county board of equalization's
decision are applicable to any protest filed pursuant to this section.
The county board of equalization shall decide any protest filed pursuant
to this section within thirty days after the filing of the protest. The
county clerk shall mail a copy of the decision made by the county board
of equalization on protests pursuant to this section to the authority or
owner within seven days after the board's decision. Any decision of the
county board of equalization may be appealed to the Tax Equalization and
Review Commission, in accordance with section 77-5013, within thirty days
-2-

LB1113 LB1113
2026 2026
after the date of the decision;
(b) That portion of the ad valorem tax on real property, as provided
in the redevelopment contract, bond resolution, or redevelopment plan, as
applicable, in the redevelopment project in excess of such amount, if
any, shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into a special fund
of the authority to be used solely to pay the principal of, the interest
on, and any premiums due in connection with the bonds of, loans, notes,
or advances of money to, or indebtedness incurred by, whether funded,
refunded, assumed, or otherwise, such authority for financing or
refinancing, in whole or in part, the redevelopment project. When such
bonds, loans, notes, advances of money, or indebtedness, including
interest and premiums due, have been paid, the authority shall so notify
the county assessor and county treasurer and all ad valorem taxes upon
taxable real property in such a redevelopment project shall be paid into
the funds of the respective public bodies. An authority may use a single
fund for purposes of this subdivision for all redevelopment projects or
may use a separate fund for each redevelopment project; and
(c) Any interest and penalties due for delinquent taxes shall be
paid into the funds of each public body in the same proportion as are all
other taxes collected by or for the public body.
(2) To the extent that a redevelopment plan authorizes the division
of ad valorem taxes levied upon only a portion of the real property
included in such redevelopment plan, any improvements funded by such
division of taxes shall be related to the redevelopment plan that
authorized such division of taxes.
(3)(a) For any redevelopment plan located in a city of the
metropolitan class that includes a division of taxes, as provided in this
section, that produces, in whole or in part, funds to be used directly or
indirectly for (i) new construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of
housing for households with annual incomes below the area median income
for households and located within six hundred yards of a public passenger
-3-

LB1113 LB1113
2026 2026
streetcar or (ii) new construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of
single-family housing or condominium housing used as primary residences
for individuals with annual incomes below the area median income for
individuals, such housing shall be deemed related to the redevelopment
plan that authorized such division of taxes regardless of whether such
housing is or will be located on real property within such redevelopment
plan, as long as such housing supports activities occurring on or
identified in such redevelopment plan.
(b) During each fiscal year in which the funds described in
subdivision (a) of this subsection are available, the authority and city
shall make best efforts to allocate not less than thirty percent of such
funds to single-family housing deemed related to the redevelopment plan
described under such subdivision.
(c) In selecting projects to receive funding, the authority and city
shall develop a qualified allocation plan and give first priority to
financially viable projects that serve the lowest income occupants for
the longest period of time.
(4)(a) For any redevelopment plan for which more than fifty percent
of the property in the redevelopment project area has been declared an
extremely blighted area in accordance with section 18-2101.02, ad valorem
taxes shall be divided for a period not to exceed twenty years after the
effective date as identified in the project redevelopment contract or in
the resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance of bonds
pursuant to section 18-2124.
(b) For all other redevelopment plans, ad valorem taxes shall be
divided for a period not to exceed fifteen years after the effective date
as identified in the project redevelopment contract, in the resolution of
the authority authorizing the issuance of bonds pursuant to section
18-2124, or in the redevelopment plan, whichever is applicable.
(5) The effective date of a provision dividing ad valorem taxes as
provided in subsection (4) of this section shall not occur until such
-4-

LB1113 LB1113
2026 2026
time as the real property in the redevelopment project is within the
corporate boundaries of the city. This subsection shall not apply to a
redevelopment project involving a formerly used defense site as
authorized in section 18-2123.01.
(6) All notices of the provision for dividing ad valorem taxes shall
be sent by the authority to the county assessor on forms prescribed by
the Property Tax Administrator. The notice shall be sent to the county
assessor on or before July 2 1 of the year of the effective date of the
provision. Failure to satisfy the notice requirement of this section
shall result in the taxes, for all taxable years affected by the failure
to give notice of the effective date of the provision, remaining
undivided and being paid into the funds for each public body receiving
property taxes generated by the property in the redevelopment project.
However, the redevelopment project valuation for the remaining division
of ad valorem taxes in accordance with subdivisions (1)(a) and (b) of
this section shall be the last certified valuation for the taxable year
prior to the effective date of the provision to divide the taxes for the
remaining portion of the twenty-year or fifteen-year period pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 18-2147, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-5-